Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-710
Tax; when delinquent; interest; penalty.

The tax provided by sections 57-701 to 57-714 shall become delinquent after the last day of each month as provided in section 57-704. Any such tax not paid within the time specified shall bear interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, from the date of delinquency until paid, and such tax together with the interest shall be a lien as provided in section 57-702. The Tax Commissioner shall charge and collect a penalty for the delinquency in the amount of one percent of the delinquent taxes for each month, or part thereof, that the delinquency has continued, but in no event shall the penalty be more than twenty-five percent of the delinquent taxes. The Tax Commissioner may waive all or part of the penalty provided in this section but shall not waive the interest.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 10, p. 613;

Laws 1967, c. 351, § 7, p. 934;

Laws 1983, LB 224, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 197;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 6.